Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 6 Accounts and Control

35-6-1.
Controller — Duties in general.

Within the department of administration there shall be a controller who shall be appointed by the director of administration pursuant to chapter 4 of title 36. The controller shall be responsible for accounting and expenditure control and shall be required to:

Administer a comprehensive accounting and recording system that will classify the transactions of the state departments and agencies in accordance with the budget plan;

Maintain control accounts for all supplies, materials, and equipment for all departments and agencies except as otherwise provided by law;

Prescribe a financial, accounting, and cost accounting system for state departments and agencies;

Identify federal grant-funding opportunities to support the governor’s and general assembly’s major policy initiatives and provide technical assistance with the application process and post-award grants management;

Manage federal fiscal proposals and guidelines and serve as the state clearinghouse for the application of federal grants;

Pre-audit all state receipts and expenditures;

Prepare financial statements required by the several departments and agencies, by the governor, or by the general assembly;

Approve the orders drawn on the general treasurer; provided, that the pre-audit of all expenditures under authority of the legislative department and the judicial department by the state controller shall be purely ministerial, concerned only with the legality of the expenditure and availability of the funds, and in no event shall the state controller interpose his or her judgment regarding the wisdom or expediency of any item or items of expenditure;

Prepare and timely file, on behalf of the state, any and all reports required by the United States, including, but not limited to, the Internal Revenue Service, or required by any department or agency of the state, with respect to the state payroll; and

Prepare a preliminary closing statement for each fiscal year. The controller shall forward the statement to the chairpersons of the house finance committee and the senate finance committee, with copies to the house fiscal advisor and the senate fiscal and policy advisor, by September 1 following the fiscal year ending the prior June 30 or thirty (30) days after enactment of the appropriations act, whichever is later. The report shall include but is not limited to:

A report of all revenues received by the state in the completed fiscal year, together with the estimates adopted for that year as contained in the final enacted budget, and together with all deviations between estimated revenues and actual collections. The report shall also include cash collections and accrual adjustments;

A comparison of actual expenditures with each of the actual appropriations, including supplemental appropriations and other adjustments provided for in the Rhode Island general laws;

A statement of the opening and closing surplus in the general revenue account; and

A statement of the opening surplus, activity, and closing surplus in the state budget reserve and cash stabilization account and the state bond capital fund.

The controller shall provide supporting information on revenues, expenditures, capital projects, and debt service upon request of the house finance committee chairperson, senate finance committee chairperson, house fiscal advisor, or senate fiscal and policy advisor.

Upon issuance of the audited annual financial statement, the controller shall provide a report of the differences between the preliminary financial report and the final report as contained in the audited annual financial statement.

The controller shall create a special fund not part of the general fund and shall deposit amounts equivalent to all deferred contributions under this act into that fund. Any amounts remaining in the fund on June 15, 2010, shall be transferred to the general treasurer who shall transfer such amounts into the retirement system as appropriate.

The controller shall implement a direct deposit payroll system for state employees.

There shall be no service charge of any type paid by the state employee at any time which shall decrease the net amount of the employee’s salary deposited to the financial institution of the personal choice of the employee as a result of the use of direct deposit.

Employees hired after September 30, 2014, shall participate in the direct deposit system. At the time the employee is hired, the employee shall identify a financial institution that will serve as a personal depository agent for the employee.

No later than June 30, 2016, each employee hired before September 30, 2014, who is not a participant in the direct deposit system, shall identify a financial institution that will serve as a personal depository agent for the employee.

The controller shall promulgate rules and regulations as necessary for implementation and administration of the direct deposit system, which shall include limited exceptions to required participation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1952, ch. 2975, § 14; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-1

; P.L. 1968, ch. 99, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 287, art. 23, § 1; P.L. 1990, ch. 247, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 10, § 6; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 45, § 6; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 8, § 2; P.L. 2009, ch. 5, art. 10, § 6; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 7, § 12; P.L. 2010, ch. 9, § 5; P.L. 2010, ch. 10, § 5; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 141, art. 13, § 2; P.L. 2019, ch. 88, art. 4, § 10.

35-6-2.
Uniform system of accounting — Establishment.

The department of administration is authorized and directed to establish a uniform system of accounting for all state departments and agencies and to require all accounts of the departments and agencies to be kept in accordance therewith; provided, that in any case in which the uniform system of accounting is not practicable, the controller shall determine the manner in which the accounts shall be kept.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 37; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-2

.

35-6-3.
Uniform system of accounting — Surveys.

For the purpose of securing uniform accounting the department of administration shall make such a survey of the operation of any department as the controller shall deem necessary and report thereon to the governor with his or her recommendations.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 37; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-3

.

35-6-4.
Uniform system of accounting — Enforcing compliance by state departments.

If any state department or agency fails to install and maintain the uniform system of accounting, or to keep its accounts and interdepartmental records, or refuses or neglects to make the reports and to furnish the information in accordance with the method prescribed by the department of administration, or hinders or prevents the examination of accounts and financial records, or hinders or prevents the visits and inspections provided for in this chapter, the department may make a report to the governor in writing, specifying the nature and extent of the failure, refusal, neglect, hindrance, or prevention, and the governor is hereby authorized and directed to review the matter so reported. If the governor shall find that failure, refusal, neglect, hindrance, or prevention exists and that the state department or agency should properly comply in the matter so reported, the governor shall direct the state department or agency, in writing, to so comply. If the failure, refusal, neglect, hindrance, or prevention shall continue for a period of ten (10) days following the written direction, the governor shall notify the controller that he or she shall not, and the controller shall not, draw any order upon the general treasurer for the payment of the salary of any executive officer of the state department or agency until the prohibition is removed.

Upon compliance with the provisions of this section by any state department or agency which has failed, refused, neglected, hindered, or prevented compliance, the department of administration shall forthwith notify the governor of compliance and the governor shall notify the controller that the prohibition of the payment of salary is removed, and the controller shall thereupon proceed to draw his or her orders on the general treasurer for the salary of the officer in accordance with law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 37; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-4

.

35-6-5.
System in division of accounts and control — Monthly statements to departments.

The state controller shall install and maintain a modern accounting system, concentrating in his or her office all major accounting and statistical information in connection therewith. At the end of each month, his or her division shall prepare detailed statements of receipts and disbursements in comparison with monthly estimates and allotments of appropriations, furnishing each department with copies of statements covering its operations for the preceding month, as well as estimates and allotments for the ensuing period.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 37; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-5

.

35-6-6.
Returns accounting for funds.

The department of administration shall furnish the clerk of the supreme court and the several clerks of the superior court, and of the district courts, and other officers required by this chapter to account to it, with such forms of accounts and returns as it shall think proper and convenient; and the clerks, justices, and other officers shall make return to the department according to law, agreeably on forms prescribed by it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 35; C.P.A. 1905, § 1096; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 36; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 36; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 38; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-6

.

35-6-7.
Forfeiture on failure to account or pay money into treasury.

Every clerk, officer, or other person who shall neglect or refuse to account to the department of administration as required by §

35-6-6

, or shall neglect or refuse to pay into the state treasury any money belonging to the state, at the time when the money ought to be paid, shall forfeit thrice the amount of the money so withheld or not paid, to be recovered in an action of debt, in the name of the general treasurer, for the use of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 36; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 37; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 37; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 39; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-7

.

35-6-8.
Orders for payment drawn by controller — Presentation of vouchers.

All orders for the payment of money out of the general treasury shall be drawn by the state controller. All officers authorized to draw orders upon the general treasurer shall present the orders, together with vouchers supporting the orders, to the state controller, who shall retain the orders, so drawn, as permanent records of his or her office.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 12; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 13; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 3; P.L. 1930, ch. 1519, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-8

.

35-6-9.
Auditing of vouchers and accounts — Orders on treasurer.

The state controller is authorized and empowered to draw orders upon the general treasurer upon the receipt of duly authenticated vouchers covering all expenditures of the state government. The state controller shall audit all vouchers before payment, shall audit all official accounts, and shall audit the accrual and collection of all revenues and receipts, and prescribe such methods of accounting as are necessary for the performance of these duties. The state controller shall establish methods of approving vouchers so that the vouchers shall be duly authenticated.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-9

.

35-6-10.
Appropriation accounts.

The controller shall open an account with each appropriation made by the general assembly, in which he or she shall credit the object for which the appropriation shall be made with the amount appropriated, and shall charge the several orders drawn against the same.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-10

.

35-6-11.
Examination and certification of accounts and claims.

The controller shall examine, adjust, and determine all accounts and claims against the state, for the payment of which provision shall have been made by law, and by appropriations made therefor, and shall certify to the general treasurer the amount due and allowed by him or her on every account or claim, the head of expenditures to which the same is to be charged, and the law authorizing the payment thereof, and the law making appropriation therefor; and all accounts so certified shall, for each year, be regularly recorded by the state controller.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 5; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 5; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 8; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-11

.

35-6-12.
Disallowance of claims or accounts.

Whenever any claim or account shall be disallowed by the state controller, he or she shall state upon or annex to the account or claim his or her reasons for disallowing the claim or account, and shall also keep a record thereof, or at least of the date, the amount, the name of the person presenting it, the nature or purport of the claim or account, and his or her reasons for disallowing it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 6; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 6; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 9; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-12

.

35-6-13.
Transmission of accounts allowed by courts.

Every account allowed by the supreme court, superior court, family court, workers’ compensation court, district court, or traffic tribunal, and every certificate allowed for any attendance in these courts in cases provided by law, and every account or bill of costs, with the items thereof, allowed by these courts, shall, be transmitted daily by the clerks of the courts, respectively, to the supreme court director of finance in accordance with §

8-15-9

; and the account, certificate, or bill of costs shall state the name of the person to whom the allowances have been made, the amount thereof, and for what the allowance has been allowed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 7; C.P.A. 1905, § 1090; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 10; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-13

; P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 1.

35-6-14.
Payments for compensation of jurors.

The state controller, based upon a statement exhibited to him or her by the jury commissioner to the supreme court director of finance, may draw an order on the general treasurer in favor of the jury commissioner for a sum certain to pay the jurors for their travel and attendance at any session thereof in any of the state courts that may require juries, which sum shall be accounted for by the jury commissioner at the time of transmitting to the supreme court director of finance the accounts named in §

35-6-13

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 8; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 8; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 11; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-14

; P.L. 1982, ch. 131, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 1.

35-6-15.
Payment of general assembly members.

The secretary of state and the clerks of the house of representatives shall, every thirty (30) days during each session of the general assembly and at the close of each session of the general assembly, severally prepare statements of the amounts to which the members of their respective houses are entitled for their pay and mileage, and shall transmit the statements to the state controller, who shall draw orders on the general treasurer for the payment thereof, in favor of each member.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 9; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 9; P.L. 1914, ch. 1019, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 12; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-15

.

35-6-16.
Payments for work on projects specifically appropriated for.

Whenever the general assembly shall make any appropriation for the erection or repair of any public building, or any armory of any military company, or any appropriation for any specified work to be done and performed, the state controller shall require satisfactory proof that the work specified in the appropriation has been faithfully done, according to the terms of the appropriation, before the money appropriated for the purpose shall be drawn from the state treasury; or, if the appropriation contemplates that portions of the money appropriated shall be drawn as the work progresses, the money shall be drawn only in proportion to the amount of the work done, or advanced upon such security as the state controller may require shall be applied to the work.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 10; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 10; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 13; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-16

.

35-6-17.
Payments on private appropriations.

All appropriations of a private nature made by the general assembly shall be payable on the check of the general treasurer, out of any funds in the treasury not otherwise appropriated, on the order of the state controller, and be charged to the account or accounts allowed by the general assembly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 11; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 11; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 14; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-17

.

35-6-18.
Records of unpaid checks.

The state controller is authorized and empowered to make and keep, upon a book prepared for that purpose, a detailed statement or record of all checks signed by the general treasurer of the state, which may be payable on account of any appropriation made by the general assembly, which have for any reason remained unpaid for one year or more from the date that the checks were signed; and the state controller is further authorized and empowered, at the close of each fiscal year, after having made this record, to stamp all the checks in the behalf of the state, as uncalled for, and certify them to the general treasurer, who shall transfer the amount of the checks from the account of the appropriations to the general fund of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1898, ch. 537 § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 12; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 15; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-18

.

35-6-19.
Records of orders and vouchers — Destruction of obsolete vouchers.

The state controller shall keep a record of all orders drawn by him or her for the payment of money out of the state treasury, which record shall show, as to each order, the date issued, the identification number thereof, the name of the person in whose favor drawn, the amount, and the appropriation chargeable with the same. The state controller shall keep, as part of the records of his or her office, a numerical file, in order of payment, and by years, of all vouchers received by him or her, in support of payments required to be made from the state treasury, and shall retain the same for a period of ten (10) years from the date of payment. The state controller is authorized and empowered to destroy all vouchers that have been retained for a period of ten (10) years or more, by burning them, provided that he or she shall first permit the state librarian to remove any vouchers having historical value for preservation in the state archives.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34 § 3; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 3; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 13; P.L. 1930, ch. 1519, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 16; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 16; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-19

.

35-6-20.
Audit of accounts of officers receiving money for state.

The department of administration shall examine and audit all accounts between the state and clerks of courts, sheriffs, jailers, town councils, town treasurers, and licensed persons from whom an account is by law required, and all other persons indebted to the state, or who may receive money belonging to the state; and, for the purpose of making the audits, it may require the production of such documentary and other evidence by the accounting party as it shall think proper.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, §§ 13, 14; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, §§ 14, 15; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, §§ 14, 15; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 17; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-20

.

35-6-21.
Repealed.

35-6-22.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 16; C.P.A. 1905, § 1092; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 17; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 17; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 19; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956; §

35-6-22

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 70; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 2, effective July 15, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 2, effective July 15, 2015.

35-6-23.
Payment of costs of witnesses in criminal cases.

Whenever any witness shall have been discharged from further attendance at the superior court at a session in any case, in pursuance of any summons issued in behalf of the state, the deputy sheriff shall forthwith obtain the proper certificate of the travel and attendance of the witness in one of the books, shall pay him or her the amount so certified to be due, from the funds provided for, shall cause the witness to receipt therefor in the book, all under the proper title of the case in which the witness shall be summoned, and, under a division of the certificates, shall indicate whether the witness was summoned before a grand jury or a petit jury. The deputy sheriff shall likewise pay all fees due officers, other than him or herself, for serving criminal process issued by the court in behalf of the state at a session, and, after obtaining proper certificates and receipts therefor, record in a book, under the proper title of the case and division thereof to which the fees apply, the items of the fees and the amount received.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 17; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 18; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 18; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 20; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-23

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 70.

35-6-24.
Certification of fees for summoning state witnesses.

The deputy sheriff shall certify in one of the books, under the proper title of the case and the division thereof to which his or her fees apply, the amount of his or her fees for summoning each witness in behalf of the state, the number of miles he or she has traveled in making service, and the amount due him or her therefor, together with the amount and items of all other fees due him or her for serving other criminal process in behalf of the state, which amount he or she may receive for the use of the state, after receipting therefor in the book, under the proper title of the case on account of which the fees are due.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 18; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 19; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 19; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 21; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-24

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 70.

35-6-25.
Advance of estimated costs of witnesses before grand jury.

At or before the summoning in of any grand jury in any county, and from time to time during any session thereof, the deputy sheriff may estimate the amount of money requisite for the payment of the witnesses, for the officers’ fees for summoning the witnesses, and for service of other criminal process in behalf of the state at any session, and until a grand jury shall again be summoned in, and, on the approval of an estimate by the attorney general, the state controller may, at any time not more than three (3) days before the summoning in of the grand jury, draw his or her order on the general treasurer in favor of the deputy sheriff for the amount of the estimated fees, and the general treasurer shall pay the order and charge fees to the account of the judicial expenses of the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 19; C.P.A. 1905, § 1093; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 20; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 20; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 22; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-25

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 70.

35-6-26.
Settlement of costs of state witnesses.

Every officer receiving any money from the treasury for disbursement as provided in §§

35-6-22

—

35-6-25

shall, within ten (10) days after the disposition of the criminal trials before juries for the session, or portion of the session, as the case may be, for which the money is obtained, record daily his or her disbursements of money and shall pay over any balance in his or her hands to the supreme court director of finance or receive any balance due him or her from the state.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 20; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 21; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 21; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 23; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-26

; P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 1.

35-6-27.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 21; C.P.A. 1905, § 1094; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 22; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 24; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-27

; Repealed by P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 2, effective July 15, 2015; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 2, effective July 15, 2015.

35-6-28.
Settlement of accounts of district court clerks.

Every clerk shall record daily all receipts and disbursements with the supreme court director of finance in accordance with §

8-15-9

.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 22; C.P.A. 1905, § 1095; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 23; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 23; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 25; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-28

; P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 1.

35-6-29.
Orders for payment of fees due in criminal cases.

The state controller may deliver to the clerk of each district court, to wardens, and to the clerks of the superior court, except the clerk of the superior court in the county of Providence, orders for fees of officers and witnesses in criminal prosecutions allowed by the courts, and by the controller found to be due to the officers and witnesses from the state; and the justices, wardens, and clerks, upon application therefor, shall deliver the orders to the officers and witnesses entitled to them.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 23; C.P.A. 1905, § 1216; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 24; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 24; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 26; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-29

.

35-6-30.
Accounting for taxes on commissions.

The secretary of state shall annually, on or before the first Monday in December in each year, report to the state controller the number of commissions to officers issued by him or her, upon which a tax is imposed, and shall report and account to the state controller for the amount of taxes thereon received by him or her; and all sheriffs and other officers receiving these commissions and the taxes thereon shall account with the state controller therefor.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 24; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 25; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 25; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 27; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-30

.

35-6-31.
Accounting for court fines and forfeitures.

Deputy sheriffs, jailers, and other persons, including clerks of courts, receiving fines, penalties, and forfeitures accruing, imposed by the court or belonging to the state, or costs due or payable to the court and/or into the state treasury, shall account daily, with the supreme court director of finance, in accordance with §

8-15-9

, for the fines, penalties, forfeitures, and costs.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 25; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 26; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 26; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 28; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-31

; P.L. 2012, ch. 324, § 70; P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 1.

35-6-32.
Court clerk’s return of fines and penalties.

Every clerk of a court shall, in accordance with §

8-15-9

, make a daily return in writing to the supreme court director of finance of all fines collected by him or her due the state, and the amount and circumstances of the fines, if any, collected by the clerk; and shall also make a return of all penalties and costs in any civil or criminal suit or process due the state, which shall have come to or been in his or her hands since the preceding return, and the amount and circumstances of the penalties and costs.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 26; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 27; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 27; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 29; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-32

; P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 1.

35-6-32.1.
Collection of unpaid fines and assessments.

The state court administrator is authorized on behalf of the state to enter into a written agreement in accordance with the judiciary’s purchasing rules and regulations with one or more qualified collection agencies to attempt to collect all fees, fines, court costs, assessment charges and/or other monetary obligations imposed by any state court and/or the traffic tribunal which are due and owing to the state and which are not the subject of a court-ordered payment plan in good standing, or are not the subject of an appeal.

Amounts recovered by a collection agency pursuant to an agreement with the state, shall be remitted to the state court director of finance and deposited in the general fund of the state or as otherwise provided by law; provided, however, a collection agency shall be permitted to retain a percentage of the amounts collected as provided in the agreement with the state court administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 2005, ch. 117, art. 25, § 5; P.L. 2007, ch. 154, § 3; P.L. 2007, ch. 160, § 3.

35-6-33.
Payment of criminal costs to person entitled.

All costs received by the clerk of any court, or other officer or person, which shall be paid by defendants or others in criminal prosecutions, shall be processed by the clerk, officer, or person through the supreme court director of finance in accordance with §

8-15-9

; and all sums so received and paid by the officials or persons shall be accounted for with the supreme court director of finance.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 27; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 28; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 28; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 30; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-33

; P.L. 2015, ch. 254, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 269, § 1.

35-6-34.
Payments on audit of accounts.

All officers and persons required by the provisions of this chapter to account with the department of administration shall pay over the amounts due the state to the general treasurer within seven (7) days of receipt of any funds.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 28; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 29; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 29; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 31; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-34

; P.L. 1989, ch. 42, § 1.

35-6-35.
Oath of persons accounting — Inquiries as to facts.

Whenever any account shall be presented to the department of administration for audit, it may require the person presenting the account, and any other person, to be sworn before the state controller touching the account, and, when so sworn, to answer orally or in writing as to any facts relating to the truth and justness of the account.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 29; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 30; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 30; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 32; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-35

.

35-6-36.
Access of controller to records of state departments.

The department of administration shall supervise the accounts of all state departments and agencies, and the department shall at all times and without notice, for the purpose of examination, have access to the books of accounts and all records relating to the receipts, disbursements, and financial management of all state departments and agencies.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 33; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-36

.

35-6-37.
Financial statements required from state departments, agencies, and instrumentalities.

The department of administration, from time to time, as it deems expedient or necessary, may require statements of financial condition and operations from the several state departments, agencies, and public authorities or corporations in such form and in such detail as it shall prescribe. The several state departments, agencies, and public authorities and corporations shall submit, as required by the state controller, a copy of audited financial statements for the most recent completed fiscal year to the state controller no later than ninety (90) days after the close of the state’s fiscal year (June 30th). A waiver from this year-end schedule may be granted upon approval by the director of administration and the auditor general.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 34; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-37

; P.L. 1989, ch. 88, § 1.

35-6-38.
Accounts of expenditures and disbursements.

The state controller shall keep fair, clear, and distinct accounts, under appropriate heads, of the expenditures and disbursements made in pursuance of the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 31; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 32; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 32; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 35; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-38

.

35-6-39.
Accounts with general treasurer.

The state controller shall keep an account with the general treasurer, and credit him or her with all the amounts paid on the orders drawn by the state controller, so that the books and accounts of the state controller shall show all the expenditures and disbursements of moneys appropriated by the general assembly.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 32; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 33; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 33; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 36; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-39

.

35-6-40.
Payment of small claims against state in motor vehicle cases.

Whenever any person has sustained injury to his or her person or damage to his or her property by reason of the negligent operation by any officer or employee of the state of a motor vehicle or other motorized equipment owned by the state, the person may file a claim for the injury or damage with the director of the department in which the state officer or employee is employed. If the director, after proper investigation of the facts, shall determine that the claim is proper, he or she may, with the approval of the attorney general and the director of administration, allow the claim, in whole or in part, but in no case in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), and the controller, upon receiving notice of the allowance, shall draw his or her order upon the general treasurer for the payment of such a sum as shall be allowed to the persons entitled thereto.

History of Section.

P.L. 1941, ch. 1071, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-40

.

35-6-41.
Refund of erroneous or excessive payments to state.

Whenever an erroneous payment or any payment in excess of the correct amount has been made to the state, the general treasurer shall refund the erroneous payment or overpayment; and the state controller, upon receipt by him or her of proper vouchers is authorized and directed to draw his or her orders upon the general treasurer for the refund of any erroneous payment or overpayment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1943, ch. 1310, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-41

; P.L. 1999, ch. 173, § 1.

35-6-42.
Disbursements pending receipt of federal funds.

Pending the receipt by the state of any approved grant or reimbursement due from the federal government in connection with any undertaking of the state, the state controller, upon receipt by him or her of properly authenticated vouchers, for the purpose of meeting the obligations of the state in connection with the undertaking, is authorized and directed to draw from time to time his or her orders upon the general treasurer payable out of any funds of the state not specifically held for any particular purpose; and the general treasurer is authorized and directed to make the payments upon receipt of the orders; provided, that upon receipt of a grant or reimbursement from the federal government, the grant or reimbursement shall be placed in the funds out of which the payments have been made. The state controller to make suitable rules and regulations governing the reimbursements.

If the state disburses its own funds for ongoing program purposes in accordance with federal law, regulation, or federal-state agreement, the state may be entitled to interest from the time when state funds are used to redeem checks or warrants, or to render payments, until federal funds are deposited into the state’s account. The federal government may be required by law, regulation, or agreement to pay interest to the state. Likewise, the state may be required to pay interest to the federal government from the time federal funds are deposited into the state’s account, until these funds are paid out in order to redeem checks or warrants, or to render payments. The amounts for transfer shall be determined by the state controller. In determining the amount to be paid by the state to the federal government, indirect costs incurred by the state may be considered. When permitted by applicable federal laws or administrative regulations, the state controller shall first offset and reduce the amount to be transferred by any and all amounts of interest payments calculated to be received by the state from the federal government, where the payments are due to the state because the state was required to disburse its own funds for federal program purposes prior to the receipt of funds. Should the interest payments calculated to be made by the federal government to the state exceed the transfer of interest transferred from the state to the federal government, the state controller shall then notify the federal government of the net amount of interest due to the state and shall record the net interest, upon its receipt, as interest revenue earned by the general fund, or any other appropriate fund within the state fund structure.

In the event that the amount available in the appropriate fund within the state fund structure is not sufficient to pay reciprocal interest, a sum sufficient is hereby appropriated out of any money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated for the payment of these amounts.

History of Section.

P.L. 1936, ch. 2376, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 44; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 65; G.L. 1956, §

35-6-42

; P.L. 1989, ch. 90, § 1.